Utah statutes.
34A-2-102.   Definition of terms.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Average weekly wages" means the average weekly wages as determined under
Section 34A-2-409.
(b)  "Award" means a final order of the commission as to the amount of
compensation due:
(i)  an injured employee; or
(ii)  a dependent of a deceased employee.
(c)  "Compensation" means the payments and benefits provided for in this
chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(d) (i)  "Decision" means a ruling of:
(A)  an administrative law judge; or
(B)  in accordance with Section 34A-2-801:
(I)  the commissioner; or
(II)  the Appeals Board.
(ii)  "Decision" includes:
(A)  an award or denial of a medical, disability, death, or other related
benefit under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act; or
(B)  another adjudicative ruling in accordance with this chapter or Chapter 3,
Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(e)  "Director" means the director of the division, unless the context
requires otherwise.
(f)  "Disability" means an administrative determination that may result in an
entitlement to compensation as a consequence of becoming medically impaired as
to function.  Disability can be total or partial, temporary or permanent,
industrial or nonindustrial.
(g)  "Division" means the Division of Industrial Accidents.
(h)  "Impairment" is a purely medical condition reflecting an anatomical or
functional abnormality or loss.  Impairment may be either temporary or
permanent, industrial or nonindustrial.
(i)  "Order" means an action of the commission that determines the legal
rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other interests of one or more
specific persons, but not a class of persons.
(j) (i)  "Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
employment" includes an injury caused by the willful act of a third person
directed against an employee because of the employee's employment.
(ii)  "Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
employment" does not include a disease, except as the disease results from the
injury.
(k)  "Safe" and "safety," as applied to employment or a place of employment,
means the freedom from danger to the life or health of employees reasonably
permitted by the nature of the employment.
(l)  "Workers' Compensation Fund" means the nonprofit, quasi-public
corporation created in Title 31A, Chapter 33, Workers' Compensation Fund.
(2)  As used in this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act:
(a)  "Brother or sister" includes a half brother or sister.
(b)  "Child" includes:
(i)  a posthumous child; or
(ii)  a child legally adopted prior to an injury.
